Mississippi, session 20251E, HB8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the support and maintenance of the Department of Marine Resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........................................... ............................................ $ 3,731,912.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in any special fund in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Marine Resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 $ 257,276,719.00. Of the funds appropriated in this section, Three Million Fifty Thousand Dollars ($3,050,000.00) is derived from the state excise taxes upon gasoline, oil and other petroleum products. SECTION 3. Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:              $   3,731,912.00 Special Funds:              $  11,217,898.00 Total Funds:                $  14,949,810.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits:           $  13,819,968.00 Progressions:               $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:            $   1,129,842.00 Total Personal Services:     $  14,949,810.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   108 Time-Limited: 65 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits.  Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2026 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2026 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2026 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2026. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2025. If the agency fills additional headcounts after May 1, 2025, until the end of Fiscal Year 2025, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally reduced to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2025 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2025 to Fiscal Year 2026, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. SECTION 4.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Marine Resources shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 5. Each Marine Conservation Officer and Supervisor shall be furnished an allowance for uniforms not to exceed Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) per annum. SECTION 6.  In addition to all other sums heretofore appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Tidelands Fund No. 3345200000 to the Department of Marine Resources for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the tidelands projects for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.... $ 6,390,440.00. This amount is allocated as follows: Total Public Access Projects...................... $ 0.00 Total Management Projects......................... $ 3,842,769.00 Bond Repayment ................................... $ 1,547,671.00 Prior Year Projects............................... $ 1,000,000.00 Total Tidelands Funds............................. $ 6,390,440.00 Each political subdivision receiving funds authorized in this section shall be held responsible for complying with Section 29-15-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall be subject to an audit by the State Auditor and shall submit detailed reports beginning June 30, and every six (6) months thereafter for the duration of the project to the Department of Marine Resources on how funds authorized in this section were expended. It is the intention of the Legislature that any political subdivision seeking to qualify for tidelands funds for the subsequent fiscal year shall submit a proposal to the Department of Marine Resources no later than July 1, 2025.  All proposals submitted will be reviewed and evaluated by the Department of Marine Resources in accordance to department plans and procedures. Multi-phased projects, multi-year projects, proposed projects with high dollar value and projects that have a record of stacking funds shall be considered as low priority projects when evaluated. It is the intention of the Legislature that if the amount of the Tidelands funds appropriated in this act exceed the actual amount of tidelands funds available, the available funds shall be allocated on a pro rata basis between projects listed in this section. SECTION 7.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the department shall place any special trust funds appropriated to the department in a special trust fund and the interest earned on the principal shall be credited to the special trust fund.  Monies in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be retained in the special trust fund for use in the next succeeding fiscal year.  The department may use the interest earned on the fund to pay reasonable costs for administering the fund and related projects. SECTION 8.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Marine Resources has the authorization to move tidelands funds between approved projects upon request from entity and proper completion of Form TTF-6 documentation. SECTION 9.  It is the intention of the Legislature for the Department of Marine Resources and the Department of Environmental Quality to continue with any agency partnerships, including grant agreements, that provide environmental projects to restore Mississippis natural resources in the wake of the Deepwater Horizon Oil Spill. SECTION 10.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 11.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, One Hundred Fourteen Million Eight Hundred Thirty-three Thousand Five Hundred Eighty-two Dollars ($114,833,582.00) is provided for the funding of the following prior year Gulf of Mexico Energy Security Act (GOMESA) projects for FY 2026: (a) To assist the City of Waveland with Center City Infrastructure Improvements  Sewer........... $ 4,000,000.00 (b) To assist the City of DIberville with Working Waterfront Marina Expansion Project Phase II........................................ $ 2,500,000.00 (c) To assist the City of Ocean Springs with Washington Avenue and Front Beach Utility Improvement...................................... $ 1,200,000.00 (d) To assist the City of Gautier with Marin Bluff and Hickory Hills Sewer Improvements.. $ 2,701,150.00 (e) To assist the City of Moss Point with Riverfront Coastal River Protection............... $ 3,750,000.00 (f) To assist the City of Moss Point with Storm Water Park................................. $   118,500.00 (g) To assist the Jackson County Utility Authority with Poticaw Road Sewer Extension....... $ 1,200,000.00 (h) To assist Mississippi State University with Fixed Lab Equipment......................... $   865,000.00 (i) To assist the Diamondhead Water and Sewer District Sewer Improvements Phase III....... $ 1,000,000.00 (j) To assist the Hancock County Water and Sewer District with Asbestos Water Pipe Replacement And Port Bienville Water Improvements............. $ 1,000,000.00 (k) To assist the Kiln Utility and Fire District with Hwy 603 Sewer Expansion from Hwy 43 To Cuevas Town Road....................... $ 2,394,530.00 (l) To assist The Nature Conservancy with Using Brood Stock Reefs to Enhance Oyster Production on Commercial Leases.................. $ 1,000,000.00 (m) To assist the City of Ocean Springs with Front Beach Bulkhead........................ $ 1,600,000.00 (n) To assist the City of Long Beach with the Small Craft Harbor Eastern Bulkhead Improvements..................................... $ 2,500,000.00 (o) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with Oyster Spat....................... $ 2,000,000.00 (p) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with Oyster Cultch..................... $ 1,000,000.00 (q) To assist the City of Pass Christian with Highway 90 Hurricane Mitigation Improvements...... $ 2,810,000.00 (r) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with artificial reef construction....... $ 1,000,000.00 (s) To assist the City of Pass Christian with Sanitary Sewer Pump Station Repairs.......... $ 2,270,000.00 (t) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with MS Reef Fish Monitoring and Assessment....................................... $   250,000.00 (u) To assist the City of Biloxi with White Avenue Storm Water Outfall Improvements ....  $ 1,277,500.00 (v) To assist the National Oceans and Applications Research Center with Mitigation of Hurricane Impacts on Municipal Harbors ...........  $ 2,370,376.00 (w) To assist the University of Southern Mississippi with the Marine Aquaculture Demonstration Center............................. $ 3,163,823.00 (x) To assist the City of Gulfport with Wastewater Treatment Plant Upgrades............... $ 1,725,000.00 (y) To assist the Southern Mississippi Planning and Development District with Mississippi Coastal Map Revisions................ $   800,000.00 (z) To assist the Institute for Marine Mammal Studies with the Dolphin and Sea Turtle Hospital and Rehabilitation Center................ $ 1,000,000.00 (aa) To assist the City of Pascagoula with the Live Oak Corridor Drainage to Remedy Flooding..... $ 2,000,000.00 (bb) To assist the City of Gulfport with the North Gulfport Wastewater Treatment Plant UV Disinfection.................................. $   376,650.00 (cc) To assist the Hancock County Utility Authority with the Stennis Space Center Wastewater Conveyance Project.................... $ 7,934,956.00 (dd) To assist the City of Long Beach with the Small Craft Harbor Eastern Bulkhead Improvements..................................... $   583,835.00 (ee) To assist the City of Pass Christian with the West Breakwater Wall Hurricane Mitigation Improvements.......................... $ 2,518,900.00 (ff) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with Oyster Spat....................... $ 1,756,128.00 (gg) To assist the Institute for Marine Mammal Studies with Monitoring and Evaluation of Sea Turtle Nesting in Mississippi................ $   856,365.00 (hh) To assist the University of Southern Mississippi with the Mississippi Coastal Fishery Resource Assessment.............................. $    55,110.00 (ii) To assist the Hancock County Port and Harbor Commission with Sewer Construction and Improvements to Site 1 at Port Bienville Industrial Park.................................. $ 1,749,220.00 (jj) To assist the University of Southern Mississippi with Oak Island Oyster Company in the Development and Testing of an Off Bottom Oyster Structure................................. $ 1,195,571.00 (kk) To assist Jackson County with Coastal Roadway Hurricane Protection..................... $   750,000.00 (ll) To assist the Institute for Marine Mammal Studies with Monitoring/Gauging Habitat Suitability for Dolphins and Turtles.............. $ 1,298,793.00 (mm) To assist the Kiln Utility District with Jourdan River Shores Sewer Improvements Phase II........................................ $ 2,163,216.00 (nn) To assist Harrison County with Sand Beach Outfall Coordination....................... $ 1,568,001.00 (oo) To assist the City of Ocean Springs with Sewer Rehabilitation........................ $ 1,960,000.00 (pp) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with Oyster Cultch..................... $ 1,000,000.00 (qq) To assist the City of Pass Christian with Highway 90 Hurricane Mitigation Improvements...... $ 1,092,205.00 (rr) To assist Coastal Mississippi with the promotion of the Seafood Industry and its Economic Contributions to the state............... $   444,941.00 (ss) To assist the City of Diamondhead with Drainage, Flood Prevention and Water Quality Improvements Phase II............................ $ 1,908,664.00 (tt) To assist Jackson County with East Beach Outfalls/Shoreline Protection................ $ 1,710,000.00 (uu) To assist the City of Gautier with Hickory Hills/Lagrange Water Quality and Stormwater Improvements.......................... $ 2,790,271.00 (vv) To assist the City of Biloxi with Keegan Bayou Restoration......................... $ 2,520,000.00 (ww) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with the Coffee Creek Outfall Pavilion.. $   419,256.00 (xx) To assist the City of Long Beach with Small Craft Harbor Southern Quay Bulkhead Improvements..................................... $ 2,554,000.00 (yy) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with Bonnet Carre Spillway Mitigation... $   926,879.00 (zz) To assist the City of DIberville with the Working Waterfront and Seafood Harbor Project......................................... $   500,000.00 (aaa) To assist Mississippi State University with the Evaluation and Monitoring of Marine Mammal and Sea Turtles after Bonnet Carre Spillway opening......................................... $   691,428.00 (bbb) To assist the American Shrimp Processors Association with the Shrimp Processors Feasibility Study........................................... $   586,126.00 (ccc) To assist the Jackson County Utility Authority with Septic System Abatements........... $ 1,258,817.00 (ddd) To assist the University of Southern Mississippi with the Mississippi Coastal Fishery Resource Assessment.............................. $       650.00 (eee) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with the Katrina Key Expansion.......... $   183,425.00 (fff) To assist the Secretary of State with the Broadwater Marina Restoration................ $ 3,578,591.00 (ggg) To assist the City of Pass Christian with Sewer Pump Station Repairs.................. $   342,585.00 (hhh) To assist the City of Diamondhead with Drainage, Flood Prevention and Water Quality Improvements..................................... $ 1,080,108.00 (iii) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with the Bonnet Carre and Mid Breton Response........................................ $   477,407.00 (jjj) To assist the City of Ocean Springs with the Front Beach Pub Access and Storm Water Mitigation Improvements.......................... $ 1,569,365.00 (kkk) To assist the City of Pass Christian with Phase II of the Gravity Sewer System Improvements..................................... $ 4,387,486.00 (lll) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with the Off Bottom Oyster Aquaculture...................................... $ 1,219,050.00 (mmm) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with the Pelican Key Beneficial Use Site........................................ $   348,220.00 (nnn) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with Phase II of the Katrina Key Expansion........................................ $   400,000.00 (ooo) To assist the Jackson County Board of Supervisors with the Pascagoula Beach Open Channel Outfalls................................. $ 1,339,000.00 (ppp) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with GOMESA project management, development and mitigation....................... $   699,023.00 (qqq) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with Bonnet Carre Response.............. $     4,636.00 (rrr) To assist the City of Pass Christian with Sanitary Sewer Pump Station Repairs.......... $   901,375.00 (sss) To assist Hancock County with Atlantic Street Sewer Improvements........................ $   102,929.00 (ttt) To assist the City of Long Beach with Small Craft Harbor SE Bulkhead Improvements....... $   280,214.00 (uuu) To assist the Kiln Utility District with the Jordan Shores Sewer Force Main Relocation....................................... $    99,852.00 (vvv) To assist the City of Biloxi with the Point Cadet Living Shoreline................. $   756,537.00 (www) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with MS Reef Fish Monitoring and Assessment....................................... $    43,074.00 (xxx) To assist Hancock County Utility Authority with Oak Harbor Sewer Improvements...... $ 2,719,248.00 (yyy) To assist Hancock County Port and Harbor Commission with Port Bienville Conservation Management....................................... $   235,327.00 (zzz) To assist the City of Pascagoula with Buena Vista Area Drainage................... $   482,340.00 (aaaa) To assist the City of Pass Christian with Gravity Sewer System Improvements Phase I.... $   784,482.00 (bbbb) To assist the City of Pascagoula with Point Park Pier Repair/Improvements............... $    31,971.00 (cccc) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with GOMESA project management, development and mitigation....................... $   472,003.00 (dddd) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with the Coffee Creek Outfall........... $    21,906.00 (eeee) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with the Coffee Creek water quality..... $    28,073.00 (ffff) To assist Jackson County Board of Supervisors with the Front Beach Erosion Control.. $   640,243.00 (gggg) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with water testing for Seafood Consumption Safety............................... $    45,262.00 (hhhh) To assist the Department of Marine Resources with artificial reef construction....... $    31,397.00 (iiii) To assist the Department of Environmental Quality with water quality.......... $   837,804.00 (jjjj) To assist the University of Southern Mississippi with the Ocean Enterprise Project..... $    24,788.00 SECTION 12.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Marine Resources shall have the authority to expend funds in an amount not to exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) from funds for the Gulf of Mexico Energy Security Act (GOMESA) that may become available to the agency in fiscal year 2026 in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds. SECTION 13.  It is the intention of the Legislature that none of the funds provided herein shall be used to pay certain utilities for state furnished housing for any employees.  Such utilities shall include electricity, natural gas, butane, propane, cable and phone services.  Where actual cost cannot be determined, the agency shall be required to provide meters to be in compliance with legislative intent.  Such state furnished housing shall include single-family and multi-family residences but shall not include any dormitory residences.  Allowances for such utilities shall be prohibited. SECTION 14.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 15.  With the funds appropriated herein, the Department of Marine Resources is authorized to make payments for expenses incurred during prior fiscal years for an amount not to exceed Four Hundred Eight Thousand Six Hundred Fifty-seven Dollars and Forty Cents ($408,657.40). SECTION 16.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 17.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.